Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8064.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-37.1-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-37.1 entitled "Sexual
Offender Registration and Community Notification" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-37.1-4. Duration of registration — Frequency of registration.
(a) Annual registration. Any person required to register under § 11-37.1-3(a)(1), or (2), or
(9) shall annually register with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city
or town in which the person having the duty to register resides for a period of ten (10) years from
the expiration of sentence for the offense and shall verify his or her address with the agency on a
quarterly basis for the first two (2) years of the period unless the person has been determined to be
a sexually violent predator in accordance with § 11-37.1-6 or unless the person is required to
register for the life of that person in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.
(b) Sexually violent predators. Any person who has been determined to be a sexually
violent predator in accordance with the provisions of § 11-37.1-6 shall be required to annually
register in person with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or town
in which the person having the duty to register resides for the life of that person and to verify his
or her address on a quarterly basis for the life of that person.
(c) Recidivists and aggravated crime offenders. Any person required to register under § 11-
37.1-3 and who has one or more prior convictions for any offense described in § 11-37.1-2 or has
been convicted of an aggravated offense as defined in § 11-37.1-2 shall annually register in person

with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the person
having the duty to register resides for the life of that person and to verify his or her address on a
quarterly basis for the life of that person.
(d) Nonresident workers and students. Any nonresident person required to register pursuant
to § 11-37.1-3(b)(1) or (2) shall annually register in person with the local law enforcement agency
having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the person having the duty to register is employed
or attends a public or private educational institution for the period of time that the person is
employed in Rhode Island or is attending a public or private educational institution in Rhode Island.
(e) Initial registration; Incarcerated individuals. All persons required to register under this
chapter who are sentenced to a period of confinement shall perform their initial registration by
appearing in person at the local law enforcement agency in the city or town in which the person
intends to reside within twenty-four (24) hours of their release from confinement.
(f) Initial registration; Non-incarcerated individuals. All persons required to register under
this chapter who are convicted in Rhode Island and who are not sentenced to serve a term of
incarceration or confinement shall perform their initial registration by appearing in person at the
local law enforcement agency in the city or town in which the person intends to reside within
twenty-four (24) hours of being sentenced.
(g) Initial registration; Individuals relocating to Rhode Island. All persons required to
register under this chapter who are moving their residence to Rhode Island from another jurisdiction
shall perform their initial registration by appearing in person at the local law enforcement agency
in the city or town in which the person intends to reside within twenty-four (24) hours of their
arrival in Rhode Island.
(h) Initial registration; Nonresident workers and students. All nonresident workers or
students who are required to register under this chapter shall perform their initial registration by
appearing in person at the local law enforcement agency in the city or town in which the person is
employed or is attending a public or private educational institution within twenty-four (24) hours
of their first day of their personal attendance at their place of employment or a public or private
educational institution.
(i) Tolling provision. Where, during the period in which any person is required to register,
a person required to register under this chapter is incarcerated or re-incarcerated for any offense or
is civilly committed, the person’s registration requirements shall be tolled during the subsequent
incarceration, re-incarceration or commitment.
(j) Juveniles. Any juvenile having the duty to register under subsections (b) and (c) of this
section shall be required to annually register in person with the local law enforcement agency
LC005629 - Page 2 of 4

having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the juvenile having the duty to register resides
for fifteen (15) years subsequent to the date of release from confinement or placement in the
community or probation for such offense or offenses and to verify his or her address on a quarterly
basis for said fifteen (15) years. However, if a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent under § 11-37-8.1
or 11-37-8.3, the court shall assess the totality of the circumstances of the offense and if the court
makes a finding that the conduct of the parties is criminal only because of the age of the victim, the
court may have discretion to order the juvenile to register as a sex offender as long as the court
deems it appropriate to protect the community and to rehabilitate the juvenile offender. Registration
shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(k) Annual registration for federal, foreign, or military offenses. Any person who is
required to register under this chapter due to a conviction of a federal offense, a foreign offense, or
a military offense shall register for the duration and frequency in the same manner as if the offense
were committed within Rhode Island.
(l) Homeless persons. In addition to the other requirements of this section, a person who is
required to register under this chapter and is homeless shall verify their presence in the community
with the local law enforcement agency where they are required to register three (3) times a week
for the duration of their being homeless.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005629
========
LC005629 - Page 3 of 4